Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1207
Emergency medical service, defined; amendment of section; how construed.

Emergency medical service means the organization responding to a perceived
individual need for medical
care in order to prevent loss of life or aggravation of physiological or psychological
illness or injury. The amendment
of this section by Laws 2012, LB646, shall not be construed to modify or expand
or authorize the modification or expansion of the scope of practice of any
licensure classifications established pursuant to section 38-1217.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 491;

Laws 2012, LB646, § 1.